Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 9
SUPPLEMENTAL PROGRAMS

31-31-901. Deferred compensation plan - definitions.

Upon the request of any employer, the board may administer and amend or provide for the administration and amendment of any deferred compensation plan adopted by such employer for members or other employees who provide direct support to the employer's public safety department.

In order to assist employers in establishing a deferred compensation plan, the board may develop, maintain, and amend a master deferred compensation plan document or a multi-employer deferred compensation plan document that is intended to comply with the provisions of section 457 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 457, as amended. Any employer may adopt such master plan for its participants with the assistance of the board; however, such employer shall be responsible for ensuring that such master plan is in compliance with applicable law. Participation by nonmember employees shall be subject to the requirements and limitations of said section 457 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", and the regulations promulgated under section 457.

There is hereby created the fire and police members' deferred compensation trust fund, which shall consist of the assets of deferred compensation plans administered by the board pursuant to the provisions of this section. The board shall be the trustee of the trust fund and shall keep a separate account of the assets of each deferred compensation plan held within the trust fund. The assets of each deferred compensation plan shall be held for the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to participants and beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses of the plan and any trust established to hold the assets of the plan. The board shall allow investment of the trust fund through the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund pursuant to section 31-31-301 (4).

The expenses incurred by the board in the administration of each deferred compensation plan shall be paid from the assets of such plan being held in the fire and police members' deferred compensation fund pursuant to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. Such expenses shall not be paid for by the fire and police pension association.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Deferred compensation" means that income that a participant may legally defer pursuant to current rulings of the internal revenue service and that, while invested under a deferred compensation plan adopted pursuant to this section, is exempt from federal income taxes on both the employer's contribution and all interest, dividends, and capital gains until the ultimate distribution to the participant.

"Participant" means:

A member employed by an employer who has requested the board, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, to administer and amend or provide for the administration and amendment of any deferred compensation plan adopted by the employer; or

An employee who provides direct support to the public safety department of an employer who has requested the board, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, to administer and amend or provide for the administration and amendment of any deferred compensation plan adopted by the employer.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 937, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 138, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2001:

(1), (2), (3), and (8) amended, p. 427, § 17, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 197, § 25, effective March 31.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-013), ch. 14, p. 41, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1005.5.

31-31-902. Group health insurance plans.

The board may enter into contracts with carriers to provide group health insurance plans for the following individuals if they are receiving a benefit from another plan administered by the association:

A retired member;

A retired volunteer firefighter;

A surviving spouse;

A dependent child; and

A recipient of a benefit from the fire and police members' deferred compensation fund created by section 31-31-901.

The administration and management of the group health insurance plans shall be the exclusive responsibility of the respective carrier. The cost of the plan, coverage, and eligibility requirements shall be as negotiated in the contract between the association and the carrier.

The association shall pay no premium subsidy for group health insurance authorized to be offered by this section. Premiums shall be deducted from the monthly benefit payments of participating retired members or their beneficiaries.

For purposes of this section, the term "carrier" means a private insurance company holding a valid outstanding certificate of authority from the division of insurance or a nonprofit hospital service plan or a nonprofit medical service plan incorporated as a nonprofit corporation pursuant to article 40 of title 7, C.R.S., or a health maintenance organization established pursuant to parts 1 and 4 of article 16 of title 10, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 938, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1005 (7).

31-31-903. Group life insurance plans.

The board may enter into contracts with carriers to provide group life insurance coverage to active members of paid pension plans administered by the association and, if they are receiving a benefit from another plan administered by the association, to the following individuals:

A retired member;

A retired volunteer firefighter;

A surviving spouse;

A dependent child; and

An individual who is receiving a benefit from the fire and police members' deferred compensation fund created by section 31-31-901.

For purposes of this section, "carrier" means a private insurance company holding a valid outstanding certificate of authority from the division of insurance.

The administration and management of the group life insurance plan shall be the exclusive responsibility of the carrier. The terms and conditions of coverage shall be as negotiated in the contract between the association and the carrier. The board may change the terms of or discontinue the coverage if the board determines that such action is in the best interests of the members. Participating members shall be notified sixty days prior to the effective date of any such change or discontinuance.

The association shall pay no premium subsidy for group life insurance authorized to be offered by this section. Premiums shall be deducted from the salaries of participating active members and submitted to the association with the employer's monthly contribution reports or shall be deducted from the monthly benefit payments of participating retired members or their beneficiaries. Participating members who receive neither salaries nor benefits may arrange alternative methods of premium payment with the association.

The named beneficiary shall be the beneficiary of life insurance obtained pursuant to the provisions of this section, unless the member or a court order names a different beneficiary for life insurance purposes. Life insurance obtained pursuant to the provisions of this section may be assigned by the member.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 938, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1005 (8).

31-31-904. Statewide health-care defined benefit plan - definitions.

The board may develop, maintain, and amend a statewide health-care defined benefit plan, including a plan document, that complies with the qualification requirements specified under the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans. The purpose of such plan shall be to provide a defined benefit to assist in paying for the costs of health care for each retired eligible member.

The board may conduct an election of all eligible members for the purpose of determining whether the eligible members want to participate in the statewide health-care defined benefit plan created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If sixty-five percent of all eligible members vote in favor of participating in the plan, all eligible members shall be required to participate in such plan, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The board shall certify the results of the election held pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, including the vote total for the eligible members of each employer. The board shall mail a copy of the certification to each employer within ten days after the certification. If less than a majority of an employer's eligible members vote in favor of participating in the statewide health-care defined benefit plan, the employer, on behalf of its eligible members, may elect not to participate in the plan. Such election by the employer must be made within ninety days after the certification of the election results by the board.

Contributions to the statewide health-care defined benefit plan shall be the responsibility of the eligible members, unless an eligible member's employer elects to pay all or a portion of his or her contribution. All of the contributions shall be credited to the defined benefit system trust fund.

The board shall administer the statewide health-care defined benefit plan on an actuarially sound basis. Neither the state nor any employer shall be liable for any unfunded accrued liability of the plan.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible member" means each member who participates in a statewide retirement plan administered by the board pursuant to this title.

"Internal revenue code" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 31-31-204 (3).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 744, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(4) and (6)(b) amended, p. 199, § 26, effective March 31.